Utah statutes.
77-7-8.   Forcible entry to make arrest -- Conditions requiring a warrant.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2), a peace officer when making an arrest may
forcibly enter the building in which the person to be arrested is, or in which
there are reasonable grounds for believing him to be.
(b)  Before making the forcible entry, the officer shall demand admission and
explain the purpose for which admission is desired.
(c)  The officer need not give a demand and explanation before making a
forcible entry under the exceptions in Section 77-7-6 or where there is reason
to believe evidence will be secreted or destroyed.
(2)  If the building to be entered under Subsection (1) appears to be a
private residence or the officer knows the building is a private residence,
and if there is no consent to enter or there are no exigent circumstances, the
officer shall, before entering the building:
(a)  obtain an arrest or search warrant if the building is the residence of
the person to be arrested; or
(b)  obtain a search warrant if the building is a residence, but not the
residence of the person whose arrest is sought.
